Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Article 1. In General

§ 36-2-101.
Composition; powers generally.

The governor, secretary of state, state treasurer, state auditor, and superintendent of public instruction, being constituted a “board of land commissioners” by the provisions of section 3, article 18, of the constitution of the state of Wyoming, shall as such board, have the direction, control, leasing, care and disposal of all lands heretofore or hereafter granted or acquired by the state for the benefit and support of public schools or for any other purpose whatsoever, subject to the limitations contained in the constitution of the state, and the laws enacted by the legislature. The board shall have the power and authority to take such official action as may be necessary in securing title to land grants, or any other lands acquired by the state. The board shall oversee the compensatory mitigation credit system established under W.S.

9-19-201

through

9-19-204

and shall promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with W.S.

9-19-201

through

9-19-204

.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 108, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 91-102; C.S. 1945, § 24-102; W.S. 1957, § 36-14; Laws 2020, ch. 112, § 3.

The 2020 amendment,

effective October 1, 2020, added the last sentence.

Editor's notes. —

Following the words “constitution of the state of Wyoming,” this section as enacted contained the words “as amended by amendment No. 8.” They were omitted by the 1931 compiler.

Laws 2007, ch. 25, directed and authorized the board of land commissioners to convey its right, title and interest, in described parcels of land to the department of state parks and cultural resources and the game and fish commission. There was appropriated an amount not to exceed six million dollars ($6,000,000.00) from the budget reserve account to the state land board for the period beginning with the effective date of the act and ending June 30, 2008 for purposes of funding the purchases.

Notice to old lessee. —

Section

36-5-108

must be read in pari materia with art. 18, § 3, Wyo. Const., and with this section and §

36-3-102

. When so read, it becomes clear that §

36-5-108

requires 15 days' notice to be given to the old lessee after the rental has been finally fixed — either by the board approving the recommendation of the commissioner of public lands (now director of the office of state lands and investments) or by taking some other action. There can be no doubt that the board is free to follow, or to modify or to disregard, what the commissioner (now director) has recommended. Reese v. Bruegger Ranches, 463 P.2d 23,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 1969).

Mandamus to require lease issuance not available. —

Where mineral lease applicant had adequate remedy by appeal from contest proceeding before the board to determine priority of applications for mineral prospectors' leases under board rules, mandamus to require issuance of lease would not lie. State ex rel. Walls v. State Bd. of Land Comm'rs, 36 Wyo. 302, 254 P. 491,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1927).

Lease without competitive bidding not against public policy. —

State oil land lease issued to developing occupant without competitive bidding was not against public policy under former C.S. 1920, §§ 699 and 706, as it was proper exercise of board's discretion to encourage improvement of the property. Miller v. Hurley, 37 Wyo. 344, 262 P. 238,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1927).

Authority to sell surface rights first. —

Under existing statutes, board was authorized to sell surface rights first, reserving minerals by requirement that purchaser convey mineral rights to state. State ex rel. Cross v. Board of Land Comm'rs, 50 Wyo. 181, 58 P.2d 423,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1936).

Cited

in

Mayor v. Board of Land Comm'rs, 64 Wyo. 409, 192 P.2d 403,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(1948).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “State Participation in Federal Policy Making for the Yellowstone Ecosystem: A Meaningful Solution or Business as Usual?” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 397 (1986).

§ 36-2-102.
Authority to administer oaths.

Each member of the board is hereby authorized and empowered to administer oaths in any proceeding of any character which may be pending before it.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 108, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 91-103; C.S. 1945, § 24-103; W.S. 1957, § 36-15.

Cross references. —

As to officers authorized to administer oaths generally, see §

1-2-102

.

§ 36-2-103.
President; quorum; duties of employees.

The governor shall be president of said board, but in his absence from any meeting, one (1) of the members may act as president pro tempore, and shall preside at such meeting. A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. The board shall have authority to prescribe the duties of all persons employed by it.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 108, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 91-104; C.S. 1945, § 24-104; W.S. 1957, § 36-16.

§ 36-2-104.
Meetings; rules, regulations and forms of procedure; records.

The board shall hold such regular and special meetings as it may prescribe and consider necessary for the proper transaction of the business before it. All meetings and transactions incident to the duties of the board, together with all protests, contests or other proceedings before it, shall be regulated by such reasonable rules, regulations and forms of procedure as may from time to time be prescribed by the board; and such rules, regulations and forms of procedure shall bear the same relation to proceedings pending before the board, and have the same legal force and effect, upon all parties to such proceedings, as the Code of Civil Procedure bears and has to civil actions and the parties thereto in the courts of this state. The board shall cause proper records of its meetings and other proceedings to be kept in suitable books, and shall preserve all important documents and papers pertaining to the lands of the state and business of the board. All votes taken to decide the board’s final action on any matter shall be recorded.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 108, § 5; R.S. 1931, § 91-105; C.S. 1945, § 24-105; W.S. 1957, § 36-17; 1997, ch. 200, § 1; 2013 ch. 184, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added the last sentence in the provision.

Cross references. —

See Editor's note to §

36-7-102

.

As to special meetings, see §

36-7-202

.

§§ 36-2-105 and 36-2-106.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 200, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1929, ch. 108, § 7, related to the appraisal and classification of lands and to the maximum and minimum rental of lands.

§ 36-2-107.
Rules and regulations; general penalty for violations; enforcement.

The board shall have the power and authority to promulgate and adopt rules and regulations not inconsistent with the laws of the state, as it may from time to time deem necessary in the direction, control, disposition and care of all state lands, and to preserve the value of the land and to recognize the fiduciary duties of the state land office. Rules adopted under this subsection shall provide that weed and pest control on all state lands be coordinated with and managed by the department of agriculture pursuant to the Wyoming Weed and Pest Control Act.

Any person who knowingly violates any provision of this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, or both. In addition, any person found guilty under this section may be ordered to pay restitution to the board for actual pecuniary damage resulting from the illegal actions of the person. Restitution may be excused if a court finds that the defendant has no ability to pay. In determining the amount of restitution under this subsection, the court shall consider, and include as a special finding, the reasonably foreseeable actual pecuniary damage that has or will result from the illegal activities of the defendant. Any restitution received under this subsection shall be deposited into an account designated by the board for use to restore the rights and property of the board. The acts prohibited under this subsection are:

Damaging state lands under circumstances not a violation of W.S.

6-3-201

;

Using a motor vehicle on state lands off an established road as defined by the board or on a road closed by the board;

Charging for or receiving payment for purposes of allowing persons to engage in hunting, fishing or any other recreational use of state lands, unless the payment is collected pursuant to a lease or temporary use permit issued by the state;

Building, maintaining, using or attending an open fire, campfire or charcoal grill on state land except in areas established by the board;

Camping overnight on state land except in areas established by the board;

Violating any lawful order issued by the board pursuant to W.S.

36-2-101

to protect state lands and assets from resource damage; and

Violating any lawful order issued by the board closing state lands for the purpose of protecting public health and safety.

Any peace officer as defined in W.S.

7-2-101

shall have the authority to enforce this section on state lands. Any game and fish department law enforcement personnel qualified pursuant to W.S.

9-1-701

through

9-1-707

shall have authority to enforce this section to the extent that there is no diminishment in federal funds provided for under W.S.

23-1-601

and

23-1-602

.

The provisions of subsection (b) of this section shall not apply to the actions of any person acting pursuant to the terms of a valid lease, authorization or permit issued by the board.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 108, § 20; R.S. 1931, § 91-120; C.S. 1945, § 24-121; W.S. 1957, § 36-20; Laws 2006, ch. 95, § 1; 2013 ch. 56, § 1, effective February 15, 2013; 2022 ch. 95, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Cross references. —

As to rules under Carey Act, see §

36-7-204

.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, added (b) and (c) and added “and to preserve the value of the land and to recognize the fiduciary duties of the state land office” in (a).

The 2013 amendment,

added the second through fourth sentences in the introductory language in (b); added (b)(vi) and (b)(vii); added (d); and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2013, ch. 22, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo Const. Approved February 15, 2013.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added the last sentence in (a).

Reasonable to grant lease to first duly qualified applicant. —

Rule of board that, in granting mineral prospectors' leases, lease will be granted to first duly qualified applicant who accompanies application with rental and fees is neither unreasonable nor unconstitutional. Walls v. Evans, 38 Wyo. 103, 265 P. 29,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1928).

Lease without competitive bidding not against public policy. —

State oil land lease issued to developing occupant without competitive bidding was not against public policy under former C.S. 1920, §§ 699 and 706, as it was proper exercise of board's discretion to encourage improvement of the property. Miller v. Hurley, 37 Wyo. 344, 262 P. 238,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1927).

Discretion of board in renewing of leases should not be interfered with by courts

except in cases of fraud or grave abuse resulting in manifest wrong or injustice. Baker v. Brown, 12 Wyo. 198, 74 P. 94,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1903).

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
62.03 (Matthew Bender).

§ 36-2-108.
Appointment of state forester; qualifications; duties.

The state board of land commissioners shall appoint a state forester who shall be the administrative head of the Wyoming state forestry division of the office of state lands and investments. He shall serve at the pleasure of the board. He shall have a bachelor’s degree in forestry with not less than four (4) years experience in professional forestry work. The state forester shall, under the general supervision of the board, have direction of all forest interest and all matters pertaining to forestry within the jurisdiction of the state of Wyoming; and may, with approval of the board, appoint such assistants and employees as are necessary in executing the duties of his office.

The state forester shall:

Take such action as may be deemed necessary by the state board of land commissioners to protect forest, range and other rural resources from fire. This responsibility shall in no way diminish the responsibility or authority of local fire protection districts;

Assist the county sheriff in the enforcement of all laws pertaining to the protection of forest and range lands from fire;

Collect data relative to forest conditions;

Prepare an annual report on the progress and condition of state forestry work;

Recommend plans for improving the state system of forest protection, management and replacement;

Whenever it is deemed essential and to the best interest of the state, cooperate with counties, cities, towns, corporations, or individuals for the protection, management and planting of trees, woodlots and timber tracts;

Promote the development of the forest industry;

Cooperate with federal agencies to fulfill the intent of this section.

History.

Laws 1945, ch. 57, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 24-130; W.S. 1957, § 36-21; Laws 1959, ch. 19, § 1; 1967, ch. 64, § 1; 1983, ch. 111, § 1; 1992, ch. 55, § 3; 1997, ch. 200, § 1; 1998, ch. 13, § 1; 2003, ch. 89, § 1.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2005, ch. 227, § 1, appropriates $375,000 from the general fund to the state forestry division for the purpose of leasing a helicopter for fire suppression for a period of up to 120 days during the fire season. The act authorizes four additional seasonal positions for the state forestry division to provide helicopter support services and, when not engaged in fire suppression activities, to perform forestry project work pursuant to § 36-2-108(b). The division is to obtain additional helicopter crew support as appropriate from local and county fire service entities.

Laws 2005, ch. 227, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2005.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “State Participation in Federal Policy Making for the Yellowstone Ecosystem: A Meaningful Solution or Business as Usual?” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 397 (1986).

§ 36-2-109.
Fire protection revolving account.

There is created the fire protection revolving account. Funds received by the state forester from local and county fire service entities and other payments received by the state forester for billable fire expenses shall be deposited into the account. Funds deposited into the account are continuously appropriated to the state forester to be expended only for costs related to fire protection activities and services, the purchase of wildland fire equipment, parts for federal excess property, supplies and to provide repairs for county and local fire service entities. As used in this section, “billable fire expenses” means any payment received from a federal, state or local entity for fire protection services or other related activities.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 38, § 1; 2005 ch. 231, § 1; 2018 ch. 23, § 1, effective March 9, 2018.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the enterprise fund” at the end of the first sentence in (a).

The 2018 amendment,

inserted “and other payments received by the state forester for billable fire expenses” in the second sentence, “costs related to fire protection activities and services” in the third sentence, added the fourth sentence, and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2018, ch. 23, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2018.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 36-2-110.
Interstate compact for the prevention and control of forest fires.

The interstate compact for the prevention and control of forest fires as contained herein is hereby enacted into law and entered into on behalf of this state with any and all other states legally joining therein in a form substantially as follows:

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 75, § 1.

INTERSTATE COMPACT FOR THE PREVENTION AND CONTROL OF FOREST FIRES

ARTICLE I Purpose

The purpose of this compact is to promote effective prevention and control of forest fires in the great plains region of the United States by the maintenance of adequate forest firefighting services by the member states, and providing for reciprocal aid in fighting forest fires among the compacting states of the region, including South Dakota, North Dakota, Wyoming, Colorado and any adjoining state of a current member.

ARTICLE II Operative Date

This compact is operative immediately as to those states ratifying it if any two (2) or more of the member states have ratified it.

ARTICLE III State Compact Administrator; Forest Fire Plan

In each state, the state forester or officer holding the equivalent position who is responsible for forest fire control may act as compact administrator for that state, consult with like officials of the other member states, and implement cooperation between the states in forest fire prevention and control. The compact administrators of the member states may organize to coordinate the services of the member states and provide administrative integration in carrying out the purposes of this compact.

Each member state may formulate and put in effect a forest fire plan for that state.

ARTICLE IV Aid to Other Member States

If the state forest fire control agency of a member state requests aid from the state forest fire control agency of another state in combating, controlling, or preventing forest fires, the state forest fire control agency of that state may render all possible aid to the requesting agency, consonant with the maintenance of protection at home.

ARTICLE V Privileges; Liability; Claims and Reimbursement

If the forces of any member state are rendering outside aid pursuant to the request of another member state under this compact, the employees of the state shall, under the directions of the officers of the state to which they are rendering aid, have the same powers (except the power of arrest), duties, rights, privileges and immunities as comparable employees of the state to which they are rendering aid.

No member state or its officers or employees rendering outside aid pursuant to this compact is liable on account of any act or omission on the part of such forces while so engaged, or on account of the maintenance or use of any equipment or supplies in connection with rendering outside aid.

All liability, except as otherwise provided in this compact, that may arise either under the laws of the requesting state or under the laws of the aiding state or under the laws of a third state on account of or in connection with a request for aid, shall be assumed and borne by the requesting state.

Any member state rendering outside aid pursuant to this compact shall be reimbursed by the member state receiving the aid for any loss or damage to, or expense incurred in the operation of, any equipment used in answering a request for aid, and for the cost of all materials, transportation, wages, salaries and maintenance of employees and equipment incurred in connection with the request. However, nothing in this compact prevents any assisting member state from assuming the loss, damage, expense, or other cost, from loaning the equipment, or from donating the services to the receiving member state without charge or cost.

Each member state shall assure that workers compensation benefits in conformity with the minimum legal requirements of the state are available to all employees and contract firefighters sent to a requesting state pursuant to this compact.

For the purposes of this compact, the term “employee” includes any volunteer or auxiliary legally included within the forest firefighting forces of the aiding state under the laws of the aiding state.

The compact administrators may formulate procedures for claims and reimbursement under the provisions of this article in accordance with the laws of the member state.

ARTICLE VI Effect of Compact on Existing Statutes; Duties

Ratification of this compact does not affect any existing statute so as to authorize or permit curtailment or diminution of the forest firefighting forces, equipment, services or facilities of any member state.

Nothing in this compact authorizes or permits any member state to curtail or diminish its firefighting forces, equipment, services or facilities. Each member state shall maintain adequate forest firefighting forces and equipment to meet the demands for forest fire protection within its borders in the same manner and to the same extent as if the compact were not operative.

Nothing in this compact limits or restricts the powers of any state ratifying the compact to provide for the prevention, control and extinguishment of forest fires, or to prohibit the enactment or enforcement of state laws, rules or regulations intended to aid in the prevention, control and extinguishment of forest fires in the state.

Nothing in this compact affects any existing or future cooperative relationship or arrangement between the United States forest service and a member state or states.

ARTICLE VII Representatives of the United States Forest Service

Representatives of the United States forest service may attend meetings of the compact administrators.

ARTICLE VIII Operation of Articles IV and V

The provisions of Articles IV and V of this compact that relate to reciprocal aid in combating, controlling or preventing forest fires are operative as between any state party to this compact and any other state which is party to this compact in another region if the legislature of the other state has given its assent to the mutual aid provisions of this compact.

ARTICLE IX Withdrawal from Compact

This compact shall continue in force and remain binding on each state ratifying it until the legislature or the governor of the state takes action to withdraw from the compact. Such action is not effective until six (6) months after notice of the withdrawal has been sent by the chief executive of the state desiring to withdraw to the chief executive of all states then party to the compact.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 75, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 21, 2007.